Nevada, session 83, SB438.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Title 55 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new chapter to consist of the provisions set forth as
sections 2 to 103, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in sections 3 to 25,
inclusive, have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. “Chargeback” means a transaction that is returned to
a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank through a payment
card network.
Sec. 4. “Deposit” means that part of the liability of a
merchant bank which is credited to the account of the holder
thereof.
Sec. 5. “Deposit account” means an account that holds
deposits.
-
*SB438*

– 4 –
Sec. 6. “Depository institution” means any state bank or
merchant acquirer limited purpose bank, association, limited-
liability company, corporation or other person organized for the
purpose of conducting a banking business, whether chartered by
this State, another state or the Federal Government, which:
1. Holds or receives deposits, savings or share accounts;
2. Issues certificates of deposit; or
3. Provides to its customers other deposit accounts which are
subject to withdrawal by checks, drafts or other instruments or by
electronic means to effect payment to a third party.
Sec. 7. “Director” means the Director of the Department of
Business and Industry.
Sec. 8. “Division of Financial Institutions” means the
Division of Financial Institutions of the Department of Business
and Industry.
Sec. 9. “Holding company” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 666.005.
Sec. 10. “Insolvency” or “insolvent” means one or more of
the following:
1. When a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank cannot
meet its deposit liabilities as they become due in the regular course
of business.
2. When the actual cash market value of the assets of a
merchant acquirer limited purpose bank is insufficient to pay its
liabilities to depositors and other creditors.
3. When the reserves of a merchant acquirer limited purpose
bank fall under the amount required by this chapter, and the
merchant bank fails to make good such reserve within 30 days
after being required to do so by the Commissioner of Financial
Institutions.
4. When the undivided profits and surplus of a merchant
acquirer limited purpose bank are inadequate to cover losses of
the merchant bank and the stockholders’ or members’ equity in
the merchant bank has been reduced below the requirements of
law.
Sec. 11. “Leverage capital ratio” means the ratio of the tier
one capital of a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank to the
average of the total assets of the merchant bank, not including
goodwill, intangible assets and money ultimately payable to
merchants, at the end of each day during the immediately
preceding month.
Sec. 12. “Main office” means the office of a merchant
acquirer limited purpose bank identified as such in the application
submitted pursuant to subsection 4 of section 39 of this act or the
-
*SB438*

– 5 –
location to which the main office is changed pursuant to
subsection 13 of section 39 of this act or other applicable law.
Sec. 13. “Merchant” means a person authorized by a
payment card network to accept payments in exchange for goods
or services.
Sec. 14. “Merchant acquirer limited purpose bank” or
“merchant bank” means a depository institution subject to the
provisions of this chapter to conduct the business of a merchant
acquirer limited purpose bank.
Sec. 15. “Merchant acquiring activities” means activities
associated with effecting transactions within a payment card
network in which a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank is
authorized to engage pursuant to subsection 1 of section 67 of this
act.
Sec. 16. “Merchant funds” means money received by a
merchant acquirer limited purpose bank as a result of its
performance of the activities authorized by section 67 of this act
which is ultimately payable to a merchant.
Sec. 17. “Merger” means the consolidation of corporate
structures which results in the uniting of substantially all the
assets and liabilities of one merchant acquirer limited purpose
bank with those of another merchant bank.
Sec. 18. “Payment card” means a credit card, debit card,
prepaid card or any other payment device issued to a consumer
that enables access to a funding source of the consumer and is
used to make a payment to a merchant.
Sec. 19. “Payment card network” means any organization,
group, system or other collection of persons that is organized to
allow participants to accept or make payments.
Sec. 20. “Payment volume” means the greater of 1/12 of the
total dollar amount of payment transactions:
1. Executed by the merchant bank in the immediately
preceding 12 months; or
2. Forecast by the merchant bank for the immediately
following 12 months.
Sec. 21. “Risk capital” means the amount of tier one capital
required to be maintained by a merchant bank pursuant to
paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of section 72 of this act.
Sec. 22. “Settlement activities” means the processing of
payment card transactions to send to a payment card network for
processing, to make payments to a merchant and for the billing of
the holder of the payment card.
Sec. 23. “State bank” or “commercial bank” means a
limited-liability company, corporation or other person organized
for the purpose of conducting a banking business that is chartered
-
*SB438*

– 6 –
by this State to conduct the business of banking and is organized
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 659 of NRS.
Sec. 24. “Statutory capital” means the amount of capital
stock and paid-in surplus required to be maintained by a merchant
acquirer limited purpose bank pursuant to section 46 of this act.
Sec. 25. “Tier one capital” means the sum of statutory
capital, retained earnings, noncumulative perpetual preferred
stock, the secured portion of a guaranty required by section 45 of
this act and any letter of credit required by section 45 of this act,
less any accounts payable by an affiliate or holding company to
the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank, goodwill and
intangible assets.
Sec. 26. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions shall
administer the provisions of this chapter, subject to administrative
supervision by the Director. The Commissioner shall make the
decisions, determinations and enter the consents and orders
necessary or reasonably appropriate to accomplish the purposes of
this chapter.
Sec. 27. An officer or employee of the Division of Financial
Institutions shall not:
1. Be directly or indirectly interested in or act on behalf of
any merchant acquirer limited purpose bank;
2. Receive, directly or indirectly, any payment from a
merchant acquirer limited purpose bank;
3. Be indebted to any merchant acquirer limited purpose
bank; or
4. Obtain any services from a merchant acquirer limited
purpose bank conditioned upon a fraudulent practice or undue or
unfair preference over other customers.
Sec. 28. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions shall:
1. Keep in his or her office:
(a) For not less than 5 years, every report made by a merchant
acquirer limited purpose bank.
(b) The original application of every merchant acquirer limited
purpose bank in a permanent file.
(c) Other administrative documents in the manner provided by
law or by appropriate regulations.
2. Provide a complete stenographic record of every hearing
and proceeding conducted by his or her office and maintain, for
not less than 5 years, a transcript of the hearing or proceeding,
together with any regulation, order, decision, determination or
consent entered in connection with the hearing or proceeding.
Sec. 29. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions shall
supervise and make all policy with regard to all foreign and
domestic merchant acquirer limited purpose banks, companies
-
*SB438*

– 7 –
and corporations governed by this chapter and doing business in
this State.
Sec. 30. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions may
cause appropriate legal action to be taken in the district court of
any county to secure an injunction or order restraining a violation
of any provision of this chapter.
Sec. 31. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions may
adopt such regulations as may be reasonable or necessary to carry
out the purposes of this chapter.
Sec. 32. All notices must be in writing. All notices issued or
required to be issued by the Commissioner of Financial
Institutions must be sent by registered or certified mail and
become effective upon their deposit in the mail.
Sec. 33. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions may,
for reasonable cause and upon 15 days’ notice, amend or alter any
license issued by him or her, but the merchant acquirer limited
purpose bank may appeal the order of the Commissioner in the
manner provided in this chapter.
Sec. 34. 1. In addition to any other requirements set forth
in this chapter, each applicant must submit:
(a) Proof satisfactory to the Commissioner of Financial
Institutions that the applicant:
(1) Has a good reputation for honesty, trustworthiness and
integrity and is competent to transact the business for which the
applicant seeks to be licensed in a manner which protects the
interests of the general public.
(2) Has not made a false statement of material fact on the
application for the license.
(3) Has not committed any of the acts specified in
subsection 2.
(4) Has not had a license issued pursuant to this chapter
suspended or revoked within the 10 years immediately preceding
the date of the application.
(5) Has not been convicted of, or entered a plea of nolo
contendere to, a felony or any crime involving fraud,
misrepresentation or moral turpitude.
(b) A complete set of his or her fingerprints and written
permission authorizing the Division of Financial Institutions to
forward the fingerprints to the Central Repository for Nevada
Records of Criminal History for submission to the Federal Bureau
of Investigation for its report.
2. In addition to any other lawful reasons, the Commissioner
of Financial Institutions may refuse to issue a license to an
applicant if the applicant:
-
*SB438*

– 8 –
(a) Has committed or participated in any act which, if
committed or done by a holder of a license, would be grounds for
the suspension or revocation of the license.
(b) Has previously been refused a license pursuant to this
chapter or has had such a license suspended or revoked.
(c) Has participated in any act which was a basis for the
refusal or revocation of a license pursuant to this chapter.
(d) Has falsified any of the information submitted to the
Commissioner in support of the application for the license.
Sec. 35. In addition to any other lawful reasons, the
Commissioner of Financial Institutions may suspend or revoke a
license if the licensee has engaged in any act that would be
grounds for denying a license pursuant to this chapter.
Sec. 36. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions may
issue subpoenas and require the attendance of parties for
examination.
Sec. 37. Except as otherwise required by the Director
pursuant to NRS 657A.430 or 657A.620, the provisions of this
chapter do not apply to a participant in the Regulatory
Experimentation Program for Product Innovation established and
administered pursuant to chapter 657A of NRS.
Sec. 38. 1. Merchant acquirer limited purpose banks must
be incorporated under the provisions of this chapter. For that
purpose all of the provisions of chapter 78 of NRS which are not
in conflict with this chapter are hereby adopted as parts of this
chapter, and all the rights, privileges and powers and all the duties
and obligations of such domestic corporations and of the officers
and stockholders thereof shall be as provided in chapter 78 of
NRS except as otherwise provided in this chapter.
2. A person, firm, partnership, association or corporation
except a merchant bank incorporated under this chapter, an
affiliate of a merchant bank or an entity otherwise lawfully
conducting business in this State pursuant to this chapter, shall
not conduct or carry on the business of soliciting or advertising
the products or services of a merchant bank. This subsection does
not apply to banks, trust companies, licensed brokers, thrift
companies and credit unions.
Sec. 39. 1. The Secretary of State shall not issue a
certificate to a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank or
company authorizing it to do business until the articles of
association, agreement or incorporation are approved by the
Commissioner of Financial Institutions.
2. The Secretary of State may not file an amendment to the
articles of the organization without the written approval of the
Commissioner of Financial Institutions.
-
*SB438*

– 9 –
3. A merchant bank shall not sell, offer for sale, negotiate for
the sale of, take subscriptions for or issue any of its common or
preferred stock until it has first applied for and secured from the
Commissioner of Financial Institutions approval of an application
for permission to organize as provided for in this section.
4. Persons who desire to organize a merchant bank in
accordance with this chapter must first execute in triplicate an
application, in the form prescribed by the Commissioner of
Financial Institutions, for permission to organize a merchant
bank before taking any other action in connection with the
organization. Upon execution of an application for permission to
organize, the original application and two copies of the application
must be submitted to the Commissioner. The applicants shall
submit with the application the name and address of each person
who is applying, the location of the proposed main office, an
itemized account of the financial condition of the proposed
merchant bank and of the applicants, the amount and character of
the proposed stock, statements, exhibits, maps and such additional
information as the Commissioner requires, together with an
affidavit that the representations made thereby are consistent with
the facts to the best of the applicants’ information and belief. This
data must be sufficiently detailed and comprehensive to enable the
Commissioner to pass upon the application as to:
(a) The character and responsibility of the applicants; and
(b) The reasonable probability of the usefulness and success of
the merchant bank.
5. If the Commissioner of Financial Institutions approves the
application, he or she shall establish as conditions to be met before
the issuance of a charter requirements as to:
(a) The minimum number of shares of common or preferred
stock to be subscribed to the permanent capital of the merchant
bank;
(b) The minimum amount of paid-in surplus; and
(c) Such other requirements as the Commissioner deems
necessary or desirable.
6. When all the requirements of this chapter and of the
Commissioner of Financial Institutions have been fulfilled, the
Commissioner shall issue a charter for the merchant bank. Except
as otherwise provided in this subsection, the charter expires 12
months after issuance unless, within that time, the merchant bank
is actively engaging in the business of a merchant bank. The
Commissioner may extend the time of the conditional expiration
of the charter for an additional period or periods not exceeding
360 days in the aggregate.
-
*SB438*

– 10 –
7. A merchant bank shall not sell or issue any of its
permanent stock until it has first applied for and secured from the
Commissioner of Financial Institutions a license authorizing it to
operate as a merchant bank pursuant to the laws of this State and
until it has satisfied the requirements of this chapter.
8. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions may extend
the time for any hearing provided for in this section, to the time
agreed upon by the parties.
9. The filing fees are:
(a) For filing an original application, not more than $4,000 for
the main office. The applicant shall also pay such additional
expenses incurred in the process of investigation as the
Commissioner of Financial Institutions deems necessary. All
money received by the Commissioner pursuant to this paragraph
must be placed in the Investigative Account for Financial
Institutions created by NRS 232.545.
(b) If the license is approved for issuance, not more than
$2,000 for the main office before issuance.
10. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions may impose
conditions requiring the impoundment of proceeds from the sale
of any stock, limiting the expense in connection with the sale of
stock and such other conditions as are reasonable and necessary
or advisable to insure the disposition of the proceeds from the sale
of the stock in the manner and for the purposes provided in the
permission to organize.
11. Every permission to organize issued by the Commissioner
of Financial Institutions must recite in bold type that its issuance
is permissive only and does not constitute a recommendation or
endorsement of the organization or of the stock permitted to be
issued.
12. Any corporation applying pursuant to this section or
authorized to organize or establish a merchant bank shall provide
for a minimum par value of its permanent capital stock of at least
$1 in its articles of incorporation. Par value of permanent capital
stock may not be reduced below $1 without written permission of
the Commissioner of Financial Institutions.
13. The removal of the main office of a merchant bank to any
other location from its then existing location requires submission
of written notice at least 30 days before relocation to the
Commissioner of Financial Institutions and, if the Commissioner
determines that his or her approval is necessary, approval of the
Commissioner. An application seeking approval, if required by the
Commissioner, must be delivered to the Commissioner, together
with a fee to cover expenses attendant upon the investigation
required for the approval, which must be not less than $200. All
-
*SB438*

– 11 –
money received by the Commissioner pursuant to this subsection
must be placed in the Investigative Account for Financial
Institutions created by NRS 232.545.
14. A merchant bank shall not pay any commissions or other
compensation for the subscription to or sale of the original issue
of its stock.
15. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions shall adopt
regulations establishing the amount of fees required pursuant to
this section.
16. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions shall
consider an application to be withdrawn if the Commissioner has
not received all information and fees required to complete the
application within 12 months after the date the application is first
submitted to the Commissioner or within such later period as the
Commissioner determines in accordance with any existing policies
of joint regulatory partners. If an application is deemed to be
withdrawn pursuant to this subsection or if the applicant
otherwise withdraws the application, the Commissioner may not
issue a license to the applicant unless the applicant submits a new
application and pays any required fees.
Sec. 40. 1. A state agency may apply for and be issued a
license to operate a merchant bank.
2. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions may, by
regulation, waive or modify any requirement set forth in this
chapter that the Commissioner determines is not appropriate for a
merchant bank that is operated by a state agency.
3. As used in this section, “state agency” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 223.470.
Sec. 41. The powers, privileges, duties and restrictions
conferred and imposed upon any merchant acquirer limited
purpose bank, company or corporation, whether foreign or
domestic, existing or doing business under the laws of this State
are hereby abridged, enlarged or modified, as each particular case
may require, to conform with the provisions of this chapter,
notwithstanding anything to the contrary in their respective
articles of incorporation or charters.
Sec. 42. Before a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank
begins business, the merchant bank must file with the
Commissioner of Financial Institutions:
1. A statement, under oath by the president or a manager,
containing the names of all the directors, managers and officers,
with the date of their election or appointment, terms of office,
primary residence and post office address of each, the amount of
stock of which each is the owner in good faith and the amount of
money paid in on account of the stock, or the contribution made.
-
*SB438*

– 12 –
Nothing may be received in payment of stock or contribution
except money.
2. If the merchant bank has applied to receive deposit
insurance from the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or its
successor agency pursuant to section 71 of this act, notice of that
fact and whether the application the application has been
approved.
3. The letter of credit required by section 43 of this act.
Sec. 43. 1. A merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall
file with the Commissioner of Financial Institutions and
continuously maintain an irrevocable letter of credit made payable
to the Commissioner to satisfy the costs and expenses associated
with a receivership of the merchant bank. The letter of credit must
be:
(a) In an amount determined by the Commissioner, but in no
event in an amount that is less than $100,000;
(b) In a form satisfactory to the Commissioner; and
(c) Issued by a financial institution authorized to do business
in this State that is approved by the Commissioner.
2. If the Commissioner of Financial Institutions takes
possession of a merchant bank, the Commissioner may use the
letter of credit maintained pursuant to subsection 1 to satisfy costs
and expenses related to the receivership including, without
limitation, the costs and expenses incurred by the receiver or
deputy receiver in administering the receivership.
Sec. 44. 1. A merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall
maintain bond coverage in such amounts and form which is
acceptable to the Commissioner of Financial Institutions. The
bond coverage may allow for a deductible amount or provision
adopted under regulations adopted by the Commissioner.
2. When requested by the Commissioner of Financial
Institutions, the merchant bank shall provide a duplicated copy of
the invoice showing that the bond premium has been paid or
satisfied.
3. The face amount of the surety bond must comply with the
requirements adopted by the Commissioner of Financial
Institutions.
Sec. 45. 1. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions
may require a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank to provide
to the Commissioner an irrevocable letter of credit made payable
to the Commissioner for the benefit of merchants in the event of
the bankruptcy, receivership or insolvency of the merchant bank.
Any letter of credit required pursuant to this section must be:
(a) In a form satisfactory to the Commissioner;
(b) For a term of not less than 1 year; and
-
*SB438*

– 13 –
(c) Issued by a financial institution authorized to do business
in this State that is approved by the Commissioner.
2. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions may require a
holding company of a merchant bank to provide to the
Commissioner an unlimited, unconditional and continuous
guaranty by the holding company to maintain in the merchant
bank at least the minimum levels of capital required by the
provisions of this chapter and the regulations adopted pursuant
thereto. The Commissioner may require any portion of the
guaranty to be secured by collateral of a type approved by the
Commissioner.
Sec. 46. A merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall at
all times maintain capital stock and paid-in surplus as required by
the Commissioner of Financial Institutions, but in no event in an
amount that is less than $3,000,000.
Sec. 47. 1. In addition to the main office, a merchant
acquirer limited purpose bank organized under this chapter may
establish and maintain one or more other offices within this State.
2. A merchant bank shall notify the Commissioner of
Financial Institutions in writing of any change in the location of
any office established and maintained pursuant to subsection 1
not later than 30 days after the change in the location of the
office.
Sec. 48. 1. A merchant bank shall not issue or publish, or
cause or permit to be issued or published, any advertisement that:
(a) Suggests that the merchant bank may accept deposits from
the general public;
(b) Is presented in a manner so as to attract depositors from
the general public; or
(c) Suggests that the merchant bank is doing or is permitted to
do any business which is prohibited by law to a merchant bank.
2. A merchant bank shall not issue, circulate or publish any
advertisement after notice in writing from the Commissioner of
Financial Institutions that in his or her opinion the advertisement
is unauthorized, false, misleading or likely to deceive the public.
3. A merchant bank shall not use the word “deposit” or
“deposits” in any form of advertising that would be prohibited
under federal law.
4. A merchant bank that is not operated by a state agency
shall not:
(a) State in any advertisement that it is under state supervision
or control.
(b) Include in any advertisement or in any instrument used by
it a replica of the Great Seal of the State of Nevada.
-
*SB438*

– 14 –
Sec. 49. 1. A merchant acquirer limited purpose bank must
obtain the approval of the Commissioner of Financial Institutions
before using or changing a business name.
2. A merchant bank shall not:
(a) Use any business name which is identical or similar to a
business name used by another merchant bank organized under
this chapter which may mislead or confuse the public.
(b) Use any printed forms which may mislead or confuse the
public.
Sec. 50. 1. The business and affairs of every merchant
acquirer limited purpose bank must be managed and controlled by
a board of not less than 5 and not more than 25 directors, a
majority of which must not be full-time officers of the merchant
bank. The persons designated in the articles of incorporation are
the first directors.
2. Vacancies in the board of directors must be filled by vote of
the stockholders at the annual meetings or at a special meeting
called for that purpose. The board of directors may fill vacancies
occurring on the board and such appointees serve until the next
annual meeting of the stockholders.
3. The board of directors of a merchant bank may amend the
bylaws of the merchant bank.
Sec. 51. A person is not eligible to serve as a director of a
merchant acquirer limited purpose bank without the written
permission of the Commissioner of Financial Institutions if he or
she:
1. Has been adjudicated bankrupt or has taken the benefit of
any assignment for the benefit of creditors or has suffered a
judgment recovered against him or her for a sum of money to
remain unsatisfied of record or not safeguarded by a supersedeas
bond on appeal for a period of more than 3 months.
2. Is a director, officer or employee of any other unaffiliated
merchant bank.
3. Is an officer or employee of an unaffiliated commercial
bank in this State.
4. Is not an investor in the merchant bank or its holding
company, if applicable, owning in his or her own right or in a
representative capacity as an executor, administrator, guardian or
trustee stock in the merchant bank or its holding company, if
applicable, of the par value of at least $1,000. For the purpose of
this chapter, a person who owns stock as a joint tenant with one
other person shall be deemed to own, in his or her own right, one-
half of the stock.
-
*SB438*

– 15 –
5. Sells or hypothecates all the stock owned by him or her, or
so much thereof that he or she ceases to be the owner, free from
encumbrances, of the amount of stock required by subsection 4.
Sec. 52. If the Commissioner of Financial Institutions
notifies the board of directors of any merchant acquirer limited
purpose bank, in writing, that he or she has information that any
director, officer or employee of the merchant bank is failing in the
performance of his or her duties, the board of directors shall meet
and consider the matter forthwith. The Commissioner must have
notice of the time and place of the meeting. If the board of
directors finds the Commissioner’s objection to be well founded,
the director, officer or employee must be removed immediately.
Sec. 53. 1. Any director may be removed from office, if he
or she has become ineligible pursuant to section 52 of this act, by
an affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the board of
directors at any regular meeting of the board of directors or at any
special meeting called for that purpose. Such action must be
ratified at the next meeting of the stockholders.
2. No such vote upon removal of the director may be taken
until he or she has been advised of the reasons thereto, either oral
or written. If the director affected is present at the meeting, he or
she shall retire after his or her statement has been submitted and
before the vote upon the matter of his or her removal.
Sec. 54. Directors and officers of a merchant acquirer
limited purpose bank shall discharge the duties of their respective
positions in good faith and with the diligence, care and skill which
ordinary, prudent persons would exercise under similar
circumstances in a similar position.
Sec. 55. The board of directors of a merchant acquirer
limited purpose bank shall elect the officers named in the bylaws
of the merchant bank, which officers shall serve at the pleasure of
the board of directors.
Sec. 56. 1. The board of directors of each merchant
acquirer limited purpose bank shall hold a regular meeting at least
once each quarter, at a time to be designated by it in accordance
with its bylaws.
2. Special meetings of the board of directors may be held
upon notice to each director sufficient to permit his or her
attendance. The president or any three members of the board of
directors may call a meeting of the board of directors by giving
notice to all of the directors.
3. At any meeting of the board of directors, a majority of the
members constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.
Sec. 57. Every official communication by the Commissioner
of Financial Institutions directed to the board of directors of a
-
*SB438*

– 16 –
merchant acquirer limited purpose bank must be presented at the
next meeting of the board of directors and made a part of the
minutes of the meeting.
Sec. 58. 1. A merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall
immediately notify the Commissioner of Financial Institutions of
any change or proposed change in ownership of the stock of the
merchant bank which would result in any person, including,
without limitation, a business trust, obtaining 5 percent or more of
the outstanding capital stock of the merchant bank.
2. An application must be submitted to the Commissioner of
Financial Institutions, pursuant to section 54 of this act, by a
person who acquires:
(a) At least 25 percent of the outstanding stock of the
merchant bank; or
(b) Any outstanding stock of a merchant bank if the change
will result in a change in the control of the merchant bank.
 Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the Commissioner
shall conduct an investigation to determine whether the character
and responsibility of the applicant is such as to command the
confidence of the community in which the main office of the
merchant bank is located. If the Commissioner denies
the application, he or she may forbid the applicant from
participating in the business of the merchant bank.
3. The merchant bank with which the applicant is affiliated
shall pay such a portion of the cost of the investigation as the
Commissioner requires. All money received by the Commissioner
pursuant to this section must be placed in the Investigative
Account for Financial Institutions created by NRS 232.545.
4. A merchant bank may submit a written request to the
Commissioner to waive an investigation pursuant to subsection 2.
The Commissioner may grant a waiver if the applicant has
undergone a similar investigation by a state or federal agency in
connection with the licensing of or his or her employment with a
financial institution.
Sec. 59. A merchant acquirer limited purpose bank may
provide for pensions, retirement plans and other benefits for its
officers and employees, and may contribute to the cost thereof in
accordance with the plan adopted by its board of directors.
Sec. 60. The board of directors shall approve the depositary
or depositaries for funds of the merchant acquirer limited purpose
bank.
Sec. 61. 1. It is unlawful for an officer, director, employee
or capital stockholder of a merchant bank to:
(a) Solicit, accept or agree to accept, directly or indirectly,
from any person other than the merchant acquirer limited purpose
-
*SB438*

– 17 –
bank or an affiliate of the merchant bank, any gratuity,
compensation or other personal benefit for any action taken by the
merchant bank or for endeavoring to procure any such action.
(b) Have any interest, direct or indirect, in the purchase at less
than its face value of any evidence of a deposit account or other
indebtedness issued by the merchant bank, excluding stock
certificates and junior capital notes.
2. A violation of the provisions of this section is a
misdemeanor.
Sec. 62. Any director or officer of a merchant acquirer
limited purpose bank or any other person who knowingly and
willingly participates in any violation of the laws of this State
relative to merchant banks is liable for all damage which the
merchant bank, its stockholders, depositors or creditors sustain in
consequence of such violation.
Sec. 63. Nothing in this chapter limits the authority of a
merchant acquirer limited purpose bank to indemnify and defend,
or to provide reimbursement for expenses of defending an action
to, officers, directors, employees, agents or other parties as such
authority may be provided under the laws of this State, if such
indemnification does not violate the limitations on indemnification
imposed by section 18(k) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, 12
U.S.C. § 1828(k), and the regulations adopted by the Federal
Deposit Insurance Corporation pursuant thereto.
Sec. 64. A merchant acquirer limited purpose bank may
purchase or lease property for its office buildings or construct its
office buildings on property purchased or leased by it, if the total
cost of land and improvements does not exceed 70 percent of the
sum of the capital, surplus and reserves of the merchant bank.
Sec. 65. 1. A merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall
not sell or issue any of its common or preferred stock until it has
first applied for and secured from the Commissioner of Financial
Institutions a license authorizing it so to do as provided in section
39 of this act.
2. Every license must recite in bold type that the issuance of
the license is permissive only and does not constitute a
recommendation or endorsement of the stock permitted to be
issued.
3. Before the sale of, or option to buy, any additional
authorized but unissued common or preferred stock, the merchant
bank must have the written approval of the Commissioner of
Financial Institutions.
4. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions may impose
conditions requiring the impoundment of the proceeds from the
sale of any stock, limiting the expense in connection with the sale
-
*SB438*

– 18 –
and such other conditions as are reasonable and necessary or
advisable to ensure the disposition of the proceeds from the sale of
the stock in the manner and for the purposes provided in the
license.
Sec. 66. 1. The license specified in section 65 of this act
authorizes the company, merchant acquirer limited purpose bank
or corporation to whom it is issued to sell its approved securities
and contracts within this State for the remainder of the fiscal year
ending on June 30 next succeeding. Each license is renewable,
under like restrictions, annually thereafter.
2. For the issuing of any license provided for in section 65 of
this act and for any renewal thereof, the fee of the Commissioner
of Financial Institutions is $400.
3. The fees must accompany the license renewal application.
A penalty of 10 percent of the fee payable must be charged for
each month or part thereof that the fees are not paid after June 30
of each year.
4. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions shall adopt
regulations establishing the amount of the fees required pursuant
to this section.
Sec. 67. A merchant acquirer limited purpose bank may
engage in:
1. The following merchant acquiring activities:
(a) Obtaining and maintaining membership in one or more
payment card networks;
(b) Signing up and underwriting merchants to accept payment
cards branded by payment card networks;
(c) Providing the means to authorize valid card transactions at
client merchant locations;
(d) Facilitating the clearing and settlement of the transactions
through a payment card network;
(e) Providing access to one or more payment card networks to
affiliates or customers of the merchant bank or customers of
affiliates of the merchant bank;
(f) Sponsoring the participation of affiliates or customers of
the merchant bank or customers of affiliates of the merchant bank
in one or more payment networks;
(g) Generating statements and other reporting of information
for client merchants;
(h) Training and technical assistance for merchants,
including, without limitation, technical assistance involving
equipment which allows the merchant to record or execute
transactions occurring as a result of the sale of goods or services;
(i) Services related to the encryption of data;
-
*SB438*

– 19 –
(j) The authorization and capture of transactions involving
payment cards; and
(k) The processing of disputes;
2. Settlement activities;
3. The accepting and holding of deposits specified in section
71 of this act; and
4. Any incidental activity approved by the Commissioner of
Financial Institutions pursuant to section 68 of this act.
Sec. 68. 1. A merchant acquirer limited purpose bank that
wishes to engage in an incidental activity must submit to the
Commissioner of Financial Institutions a request to engage in the
activity. The request must include, without limitation, a
description of:
(a) The incidental activity;
(b) The reason that the merchant bank wishes to engage in the
activity;
(c) The safeguards or protections which will be employed to
ensure the continuing sound operation of the merchant bank;
(d) The need or convenience to customers of the merchant
bank;
(e) Any legal justification required by state law; and
(f) The financial ability of the merchant bank to support the
incidental activity.
2. Upon receipt of a request submitted pursuant to subsection
1, the Commissioner of Financial Institutions may request from
the merchant bank any additional information the Commissioner
determines is necessary to evaluate the request. The merchant
bank shall provide the Commissioner the information requested
not later than 30 days after receipt of the request from the
Commissioner.
3. Not later than 60 days after the receipt of a request
submitted pursuant to subsection 1, the Commissioner of
Financial Institutions shall approve, conditionally approve or
deny the request or request additional information pursuant to
subsection 2. If the Commissioner does not take any of those
actions within 60 days after the receipt of the request, the request
shall be deemed to be approved.
Sec. 69. 1. A merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall
not engage in a merchant acquiring activity unless the activity
originates in the United States and the merchant with whom the
activity is engaged has a physical location in the United States. If
a merchant bank engages in any merchant acquiring activity
through the Internet or another electronic medium, the merchant
with whom the activity is engaged must have a fixed place of
business in the United States.
-
*SB438*

– 20 –
2. As used in this section, “United States” includes any state
of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth
of Puerto Rico, Guam, American Samoa, the United States Virgin
Islands, the Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana Islands or
any territory or possession of the United States.
Sec. 70. 1. A merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall
not engage in any activity that is not authorized by the provisions
of this chapter or the regulations adopted pursuant thereto. Such
prohibited activities include, without limitation:
(a) Engaging in the business of banking;
(b) Except as otherwise provided in section 71 of this act, the
accepting and holding of deposits;
(c) Money transmission, as defined in NRS 671.013;
(d) Acting as a fiduciary;
(e) Sponsoring automated teller machines or other cash
dispensing machines;
(f) Issuing payment cards branded by a payment card network;
(g) The factoring or financing of receivables of a merchant;
(h) Activities involving advancing money to a person;
(i) Soliciting, processing or making loans; and
(j) Self-acquiring activities.
2. A merchant bank that performs merchant acquiring
activities shall not be deemed to be engaged in self-acquiring
activities merely because the merchant bank imposes fees or other
charges to merchants related solely to the performance of
merchant acquiring activities.
3. As used in this section “self-acquiring activity” means the
performance of merchant acquiring activities or settlement
activities by a merchant or an affiliated entity of a merchant on its
own behalf for payments the merchant or the affiliated entity
receives for goods or services the merchant or affiliated entity
provides to consumers.
Sec. 71. 1. A merchant acquirer limited purpose bank may
only accept and hold deposits from a corporation that owns a
majority of the shares of the merchant bank. The corporation
shall not withdraw a deposit by check or similar means for
payment to a third party.
2. Any deposit authorized by subsection 1 must be taken at
the main office of the merchant bank. Any records concerning
such a deposit must be maintained at the main office of the
merchant bank.
3. A merchant bank shall not operate in any manner so as to
attract depositors from the general public.
-
*SB438*

– 21 –
4. A merchant bank may apply to receive deposit insurance
from the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or its successor
agency.
Sec. 72. 1. A merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall
continuously maintain:
(a) A leverage capital ratio of not less than 10 percent;
(b) The following amount of payment volume capital:
(1) Five percent of payment volume for payment volume
that does not exceed $10,000,000;
(2) An additional 3 percent of payment volume for payment
volume that exceeds $10,000,000 but does not exceed $25,000,000;
(3) An additional 1.5 percent of payment volume for
payment volume that exceeds $25,000,000 but does not exceed
$100,000,000;
(4) An additional 0.75 percent of payment volume for
payment volume that exceeds $100,000,000 but does not exceed
$250,000,000;
(5) An additional 0.25 percent of payment volume for
payment volume that exceeds $250,000,000 but does not exceed $1
billion;
(6) An additional 0.15 percent of payment volume for
payment volume that exceeds $1 billion but does not exceed $5
billion;
(7) An additional 0.08 percent of payment volume for
payment volume that exceeds $5 billion but does not exceed $20
billion; and
(8) An additional 0.05 percent of payment volume for
payment volume that exceeds $20 billion;
(c) An amount of risk capital that is not less than the greater
of:
(1) An amount that is two times the average monthly
chargebacks in the immediately preceding 6 months; or
(2) An amount that is two times the average monthly
forecast dollar volume of chargebacks for a 6-month period; and
(d) The amount of capital stock and paid-in surplus required
by section 46 of this act.
2. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions may
determine that a merchant bank that, at any time, has less than the
minimum leverage capital ratio, payment volume capital, risk
capital or statutory capital required by subsection 1 is operating in
an unsafe or injurious manner. Such a merchant bank shall
comply with any order or action taken by the Commissioner to
restore the merchant bank to adequate capitalization.
Sec. 73. 1. A merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall
deposit all merchant funds received by the bank in an account at a
-
*SB438*

– 22 –
financial institution that is federally insured and authorized to do
business in this State immediately after receipt. When deposited
into the account, the merchant funds shall be deemed to be the
property of the merchant to whom the funds are payable and must
remain in the account until paid over to the merchant.
2. A merchant bank shall maintain records with respect to the
account required by subsection 1 which identify individual
merchants and allow the total amount held in the account for each
individual merchant to be readily ascertained.
3. Any agreement required to open and maintain the account
required by subsection 1 and any records relating to the account
must expressly provide that the account is maintained for the
benefit of the individual merchants of the merchant bank.
4. A merchant bank and its officers have a fiduciary duty to
preserve and account for proceeds ultimately payable to a
merchant and are liable for all such proceeds.
5. A merchant bank shall not pledge or otherwise grant a
security interest in merchant funds.
6. The provisions of this section do not prohibit a merchant
bank from making appropriate deductions from merchant funds
for chargebacks, fees, reserves and other costs related to the
provisions of merchant acquiring services owed by a merchant
before remitting the net amount to that merchant.
Sec. 74. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a
merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall not make any
investment.
2. A merchant bank may invest in:
(a) Obligations of, or obligations guaranteed fully as to
principal and interest by, the United States;
(b) Obligations of and guaranteed fully as to principal and
interest by any Federal Home Loan Bank or Federal Farm Credit
Bank, the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation or the
Federal National Mortgage Association;
(c) An obligation of any state or any political subdivision of a
state for which the interest on the obligation is exempt from
federal income taxation;
(d) Prime bankers’ acceptances;
(e) The units of any unit investment trust if:
(1) The assets of the trust are invested exclusively in the
type of securities described in this subsection at the time the
investment is made; or
(2) The obligations held by the trust are limited to
obligations within one of the two top rating categories of any
nationally recognized statistical rating organization;
-
*SB438*

– 23 –
(f) The shares of any mutual fund if the distributions from the
fund are treated for the purposes of federal income tax in the same
manner as the interest on the obligations in which the fund invests
and:
(1) The investments of the fund consist exclusively of the
type of obligations described in this subsection at the time the
investment is made; and
(2) The obligations held by the fund are limited to
obligations rated within one of the two top rating categories of any
nationally recognized statistical rating organization;
(g) Securities lending transactions involving the securities of
the type described in this subsection;
(h) Obligations of corporations organized under the laws of
this State or any other state if the:
(1) The corporation has a market capitalization of at least
$500,000,000; and
(2) The obligation is rated in one of the two top rating
categories of any nationally recognized statistical rating
organization; and
(i) Any other investment approved by the Commissioner of
Financial Institutions.
3. A merchant bank shall, not more than 10 days after
making an investment authorized by this section, provide notice to
the Commissioner of Financial Institutions of the investment. The
merchant bank shall provide to the Commissioner any information
concerning such an investment that the Commissioner may
request.
4. Any securities in which a merchant bank invests pursuant
to this section must be held in book entry form and maintained at
a federally insured financial institution, Federal Home Loan
Bank or, for securities with a market value of not more than
$500,000, a broker-dealer insured under the Securities Investor
Protection Act of 1970, 15 U.S.C. § 78aaa.
Sec. 75. 1. Each merchant acquirer limited purpose bank
doing business in this State shall file with the Commissioner of
Financial Institutions a report containing any information or
other facts the Commissioner deems necessary.
2. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions shall adopt
regulations establishing the information to be reported and the
amount of the fee that may be imposed pursuant to this subsection.
3. Every merchant bank shall pay to the Commissioner of
Financial Institutions for supervision and examination a fee based
on the rate established and, if applicable, adjusted pursuant to
NRS 658.101.
-
*SB438*

– 24 –
Sec. 76. Each such merchant acquirer limited purpose bank
shall cause to be supplied to the Commissioner of Financial
Institutions at any time, upon his or her demand, any information
which he or she may require as to the condition, affairs or
methods of the merchant bank.
Sec. 77. 1. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions
may conduct or cause to be conducted such hearings,
investigations or examinations of the books and records, wherever
they may be, relating to the affairs of such organizations as he or
she may deem expedient and in aid of the proper administration of
the provisions of this chapter.
2. Except as otherwise provided in section 83 of this act, all
examination reports and all information obtained by the
Commissioner of Financial Institutions in conducting hearings,
investigations or examinations under the provisions of this
chapter, including all related correspondence and memoranda,
and information obtained by the Commissioner from other state or
federal bank regulatory authorities with whom the Commissioner
has entered into agreements for the confidential sharing of such
information, and information obtained by the Commissioner
relating to the examination and supervision of any corporation
which is an affiliate of a merchant bank is confidential and
privileged information and must not be made public or otherwise
disclosed to any person, firm, corporation, agency, association,
governmental body, court or other entity.
3. Any information submitted by a person to the
Commissioner of Financial Institutions for any purpose under this
chapter shall not be construed as waiving, destroying or otherwise
affecting any privilege such person may claim with respect to such
information under federal or state law as to any person or entity
other than the Commissioner.
4. In connection with the conduct of any hearing,
investigation or examination, the Commissioner of Financial
Institutions or other person designated by him or her to conduct it
may:
(a) Compel the attendance of any person by subpoena.
(b) Administer oaths.
(c) Examine any person under oath concerning the business
and conduct of affairs of any merchant bank subject to the
provisions of this chapter, and require the production of any
books, papers, records, money and securities relevant to the
inquiry. Any willful false swearing is perjury and is punishable as
such.
-
*SB438*

– 25 –
5. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions shall conduct
at least once every 2 years an examination of the books and
records of each merchant bank licensed under this chapter.
Sec. 78. 1. For the purpose of discovering violations of this
chapter or securing information lawfully required under this
chapter, the Commissioner of Financial Institutions or his or her
duly authorized representatives may, at any time, investigate the
business and examine the books, accounts, papers and records
used therein of any:
(a) Merchant acquirer limited purpose bank;
(b) Other person engaged in an activity regulated pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter; and
(c) Person whom the Commissioner has reasonable cause to
believe is violating or is about to violate any provision of this
chapter, whether or not the person claims to be within the
authority or beyond the scope of this chapter.
2. For the purpose of examination, the Commissioner of
Financial Institutions or his or her authorized representatives
must have and be given free access to the offices and places of
business, files, safes and vaults of such persons.
3. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions may require
the attendance of any person and examine him or her under oath
regarding:
(a) Any transaction or business regulated pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter; or
(b) The subject matter of any audit, examination, investigation
or hearing.
Sec. 79. 1. In case of the refusal of any person to attend or
testify or produce any papers required by the subpoena directed to
be served under the provision of section 77 of this act, the
Commissioner of Financial Institutions may report to the district
court in and for the county in which the examination, hearing or
investigation is pending by petition, setting forth that:
(a) Due notice has been given of the time and place of
attendance of the person or the production of the books and
papers;
(b) The person has been subpoenaed in the manner prescribed
in this chapter; and
(c) The person has failed and refused to attend or produce the
papers required by subpoena before the Commissioner in the
examination, hearing or investigation named in the subpoena, or
has refused to answer questions propounded to him or her in the
course of such examination, hearing or investigation,
-
*SB438*

– 26 –
 and asking an order of the court compelling the person to
attend and testify or produce the books or papers before the
Commissioner.
2. The court, upon petition of the Commissioner of Financial
Institutions, shall enter an order directing the person to appear
before the court at a time and place to be fixed by the court in
such order, the time to be not more than 10 days from the date of
the order, and then and there show cause why he or she has not
attended or testified or produced the books or papers before the
Commissioner. A certified copy of the order must be served upon
the person. If it appears to the court that the subpoena was
regularly issued by the Commissioner, the court shall thereupon
enter an order that the person appear before the Commissioner at
the time and place fixed in the order and testify or produce the
required books or papers. Upon failure to obey the order, the
person shall be dealt with as for contempt of court.
Sec. 80. 1. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions
may, at the time of examining a merchant acquirer limited
purpose bank, inspect the books, ledgers and minutes of any
holding company whenever, in his or her discretion, the
Commissioner considers it advisable to ascertain facts which may
relate to transactions between the holding company and the
affiliated merchant bank. The provisions of section 77 of this act
apply to the examination of such corporation.
2. Upon making findings to that end, the Commissioner of
Financial Institutions may order the discontinuance of borrowing
or lending, selling or buying of assets, extending credit or
guaranteeing obligations of the holding company which has been
undertaken without the written approval of the Commissioner.
3. A holding company which controls a merchant bank shall
not impose any unreasonable supervisory fees upon the merchant
bank.
Sec. 81. 1. Whenever in connection with an examination it
is necessary or expedient that the Commissioner of Financial
Institutions or his or her designee, or both, leave this State, there
must be assessed against the organization under examination a fee
of not more than the per diem allowance and travel expenses
provided for state officers and employees generally for each
person while outside the State in connection with an examination,
together with all actual and necessary expenses.
2. The fee charged must be remitted to the Commissioner of
Financial Institutions. The Commissioner shall adopt regulations
establishing the amount of the fee required pursuant to this
section.
-
*SB438*

– 27 –
Sec. 82. In lieu of making any examination, the
Commissioner of Financial Institutions may accept any
examination of any merchant acquirer limited purpose bank made
by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or may examine
any such institution in conjunction with the Federal Deposit
Insurance Corporation.
Sec. 83. 1. Before disclosing or furnishing any document,
report or information under this section, the Commissioner of
Financial Institutions must determine that such document, report
or information will receive protection from further disclosure
comparable to the protections provided by this chapter.
2. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions or his or her
agents and employees may furnish all or any part of an
examination report, work paper, supervisory agreement or
directive, order or other information obtained in the conduct of a
hearing, investigation or examination under the provisions of this
chapter to:
(a) An agency of the Federal Government or of another state
empowered to examine or supervise a merchant bank, a holding
company owning a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank or a
subsidiary of such holding company;
(b) An official empowered to investigate criminal charges
subject to legal process, valid search warrant or subpoena,
provided that the Commissioner may only furnish that part of any
document or report which is necessary and pertinent to the
investigation, and the Commissioner may do this only after
notifying the affected merchant bank and any customer of the
merchant bank who is named in such part of the document or
report ordered to be furnished unless the official requesting the
document or report first obtains a waiver of the notice requirement
from a court of competent jurisdiction for good cause;
(c) The examined merchant bank or holding company thereof;
(d) A receiver or liquidator appointed pursuant to this chapter;
or
(e) The court in a proceeding initiated by the Commissioner
concerning the merchant bank if the Commissioner first provides
such notice to the merchant bank as will afford the merchant bank
an opportunity to object or to seek a protective order.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 4 and 5, all
documents, reports and information furnished by the
Commissioner of Financial Institutions pursuant to this section
remain the property of the Division of Financial Institutions, and
no person, agency or authority to whom such documents, reports
or information are made available, or any officer, director or
employee thereof, may disclose any of the documents, reports or
-
*SB438*

– 28 –
information contained therein, except in published statistical
material that does not disclose the affairs of any natural person or
corporation.
4. An examination report made by the Division of Financial
Institutions is designed for use in the supervision of a merchant
bank. The report shall remain the property of the Commissioner of
Financial Institutions and will be furnished to the merchant bank
solely for its confidential use. The merchant bank may disclose the
report or relevant portions thereof to any of its directors, officers,
employees, agents or affiliates as necessary and appropriate in the
conduct of its affairs. Under no circumstances may the merchant
bank or any of its directors, officers, employees, agents or
affiliates disclose or make public in any manner the report or any
portion thereof to any person or organization not connected with
the merchant bank as officer, director, employee, attorney, auditor
or candidate for executive office with the merchant bank or its
holding company. The merchant bank may also, after execution of
an agreement not to disclose information in the report, disclose
the report or relevant portions thereof to a party proposing to
acquire or merge with the merchant bank.
5. Except for an examination report as provided in subsection
4, a merchant bank may disclose any document, report or
information provided by the merchant bank to the Commissioner
of Financial Institutions and any document, report or information
received by the merchant bank from the Commissioner to any of
its directors, officers, employees, agents or affiliates as necessary
and appropriate in the conduct of its affairs.
6. A merchant bank, a bank holding company or owning a
merchant bank or a subsidiary of such a holding company, does
not violate this section by complying with a duty to report to the
Securities and Exchange Commission, including, without
limitation, by disclosing any order of the Commissioner of
Financial Institutions pursuant to such a duty.
Sec. 84. 1. Each merchant acquirer limited purpose bank
shall, at least once each year, cause its books and accounts to be
audited at its own expense by a certified public accountant or firm
of such accountants selected by the merchant bank and approved
by the Commissioner of Financial Institutions.
2. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions may prescribe
the scope of the audit.
3. A certified copy of the audit, including the management
and internal control letters relating to the audit, must be furnished
to the Commissioner of Financial Institutions.
Sec. 85. Each merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall
pay the assessment levied pursuant to NRS 658.055 and cooperate
-
*SB438*

– 29 –
fully with the audits and examinations performed pursuant
thereto.
Sec. 86. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions may
after notice and hearing suspend or revoke the charter of any
merchant bank for:
1. Repeated failure to abide by the provisions of this chapter
or the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
2. Failure to pay a tax as required pursuant to the provisions
of chapter 363A or 363C of NRS.
Sec. 87. 1. If the Commissioner of Financial Institutions
finds as the result of any examination or from any report made to
him or her or to any merchant acquirer limited purpose bank
doing business in this State or from any report made to any of its
investors that the merchant bank is violating the provisions of its
articles of incorporation, charter, bylaws, or any law of this State,
or is conducting its business in an unsafe or injurious manner, he
or she may by an order addressed to such merchant bank direct a
discontinuance of such violations or unsafe or injurious practices
and a conformity with all the requirements of law.
2. If a merchant bank does not comply with such order, the
Commissioner of Financial Institutions may order the corporate
secretary to call a special directors’ meeting to consider the matter
of noncompliance.
3. The meeting must be held no later than 60 days after
issuance of the order to hold the meeting, unless otherwise
restrained by court order or by the board. The business of the
meeting must be limited to the matter of noncompliance and
remedies therefor and the notice of such meeting must set forth in
detail the Commissioner of Financial Institutions’ discontinuance
order and order to call a directors’ meeting.
4. Action taken at the meeting is binding upon the officers of
the merchant bank.
Sec. 88. 1. A merchant acquirer limited purpose bank may
reorganize, merge or consolidate with another merchant bank, if
the reorganization, merger or consolidation is based upon a plan
which has been adopted by the board of directors and approved at
a regular or special stockholders’ meeting which has been called
to consider the action. The approval must rest on a favorable vote
of a majority of the voting power of the merchant bank as
established by its articles.
2. Any such plan for reorganization, merger or consolidation
must be approved by the Commissioner of Financial Institutions.
In submitting an application for approval of any such plan, each
merchant bank proposing to reorganize, merge or consolidate
-
*SB438*

– 30 –
must provide any and all information and other facts which the
Commissioner requires for review of the proposed transaction.
3. Unless its action is specifically authorized by or taken in
conformity with this chapter, a merchant bank may not, directly or
indirectly:
(a) Reorganize, merge or consolidate.
(b) Assume liability to pay deposit accounts or other liabilities
of any financial institution or any other organization, person or
entity.
(c) Transfer assets to any financial institution or any other
organization, person or entity in consideration of the transferee’s
assumption of liability for any portion of the transferor’s deposit
accounts, deposits or other liability.
(d) Acquire the assets of any financial institution or any other
organization, person or entity.
4. Each application which is made under this section must be
accompanied by a fee payment of not more than $300. The
responsibility for payment of the fee must be shared equally by the
merchant banks participating in each proposed plan.
5. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions shall adopt
regulations establishing the amount of the fee required pursuant
to this section.
Sec. 89. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
merchant acquirer limited purpose bank may go into voluntary
liquidation pursuant to the provisions of NRS 78.580 or 86.491.
2. If the voluntary liquidation of the merchant bank results
from a vote or agreement of the stockholders or members of the
merchant bank, a certified copy of all proceedings of the meeting
at which that action is taken, verified by the oath of the president
or a manager, must be transmitted to the Commissioner of
Financial Institutions for the Commissioner’s approval. If the
Commissioner approves the liquidation, the Commissioner shall
issue to the merchant bank, under the Commissioner’s seal, a
permit for that purpose. No permit may be issued by the
Commissioner until the Commissioner is satisfied that provision
has been made by the merchant bank to satisfy and pay off all
depositors and all creditors of the merchant bank. If the
Commissioner is not satisfied, the Commissioner shall not issue a
permit, but the Commissioner may take possession of the
merchant bank, its assets and business, and liquidate the
merchant bank in the manner provided by this chapter.
3. When the Commissioner of Financial Institutions approves
the voluntary liquidation of a merchant bank pursuant to
subsection 2, the directors or managers of the merchant bank
shall cause to be published, in a newspaper in the city, town or
-
*SB438*

– 31 –
county in which the main office of the merchant bank is located, a
notice that the merchant bank is closing its affairs and going into
liquidation, and that its depositors and creditors are to present
their claims for payment.
4. When any merchant bank is in the process of voluntary
liquidation, it is subject to examination by the Commissioner of
Financial Institutions, and the merchant bank shall furnish such
reports, from time to time, as may be called for by the
Commissioner.
5. All unclaimed deposits and dividends remaining in the
hands of the merchant bank are subject to the provisions of this
chapter.
6. Any merchant bank that is in the process of voluntary
liquidation may sell and transfer to any other state bank, national
bank or federal savings bank all or any portion of its assets of
every kind upon such terms as may be agreed upon and approved
by the Commissioner of Financial Institutions and by a majority
vote of the merchant bank’s board of directors or of its managers.
A certified copy of the minutes of any meeting at which that action
is taken, under the oath of the president or a manager, and a copy
of the contract of sale and transfer must be filed with the
Commissioner.
7. If a voluntary liquidation or the sale and transfer of the
assets of any merchant bank is approved by the Commissioner of
Financial Institutions, a certified copy of that approval under seal
of the Commissioner, filed in the Office of the Secretary of State,
authorizes the cancellation of the articles of incorporation or
organization of the merchant bank, subject to its continued
existence, as provided by law.
Sec. 90. The provisions of sections 91 to 100, inclusive, of
this act apply to a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank whose
deposit accounts are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation.
Sec. 91. 1. The Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation
created by the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, 12 U.S.C. § 1811,
may act without bond as receiver or liquidator of any merchant
acquirer limited purpose bank which:
(a) Has been closed because of inability to meet the demands
of its depositors; and
(b) Is insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation
and has been taken possession of by the Commissioner of
Financial Institutions pursuant to NRS 658.151.
2. The appropriate state authority having the right to appoint
a receiver or liquidator of a merchant bank may, upon such
closing, tender to the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation the
-
*SB438*

– 32 –
appointment as receiver or liquidator of such merchant bank. If
the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation accepts the
appointment, it shall have and possess all the powers and
privileges provided by the laws of this State with respect to a
receiver or liquidator, respectively, of a merchant bank, its
depositors and other creditors, and is subject to all the duties of
such receiver or liquidator, except insofar as such powers,
privileges or duties are in conflict with the provisions of the
Federal Deposit Insurance Act.
Sec. 92. Upon the acceptance of the appointment as receiver
or liquidator by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the
possession of and title to all the assets, business and property of
such merchant acquirer limited purpose bank of every kind and
nature shall pass to and vest in the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation without the execution of any instruments of
conveyance, assignment, transfer or endorsement.
Sec. 93. Among its other powers, the Federal Deposit
Insurance Corporation, in the performance of its powers and
duties as receiver or liquidator, may, upon the order of a court of
record of competent jurisdiction, enforce the individual liability of
the stockholders or members and directors or managers of any
such merchant acquirer limited purpose bank.
Sec. 94. 1. When any state merchant acquirer limited
purpose bank has been closed as provided in section 91 of this act,
and the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation pays, or makes
available for payment, the insured deposit liabilities of such closed
merchant bank, must be subrogated to all rights against such
closed bank of the owners of such deposits in the same manner
and to the same extent as the subrogation of the Federal Deposit
Insurance Corporation is provided for in the Federal Deposit
Insurance Act in the case of the closing of a national bank.
2. The rights of depositors and other creditors of such closed
merchant bank will be determined in accordance with the
applicable provisions of the laws of this State.
Sec. 95. 1. Any merchant acquirer limited purpose bank
which is, or may hereafter be, closed on account of inability to
meet the demands of its depositors, by action of the Commissioner
of Financial Institutions, by action of a court, by action of its
directors or due to its insolvency or suspension, the Commissioner,
or the receiver or liquidator of the merchant bank with the
permission of the Commissioner, may borrow from the Federal
Deposit Insurance Corporation and furnish any part or all of the
assets of the merchant bank to the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation as security for a loan from it, but where the Federal
Deposit Insurance Corporation is acting as the receiver or
-
*SB438*

– 33 –
liquidator, the order of a court of record of competent jurisdiction
must be first obtained approving the loan.
2. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions, or the
receiver or liquidator of any merchant bank with the permission of
the Commissioner, upon the order of a court of record of
competent jurisdiction, may sell to the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation any part or all of the assets of the merchant bank.
3. The provisions of this section do not limit the power of any
merchant bank, the Commissioner of Financial Institutions,
receivers or liquidators to pledge or sell assets in accordance with
any other existing law.
Sec. 96. 1. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions
shall furnish to the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or to
any official or examiner thereof, a copy of all examinations made
of any merchant bank and of all reports made by the merchant
acquirer limited purpose bank. The Commissioner shall give
access to and disclose to the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation, or to any official or examiner thereof, all
information possessed by the office of the Division of Financial
Institutions with reference to the conditions or affairs of any
merchant bank.
2. Nothing in this section limits:
(a) The duty of a merchant bank in this State to comply with
any provisions of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, its
amendments or substitutions, or the requirements of the Federal
Deposit Insurance Corporation relative to examinations and
reports; or
(b) The powers of the Commissioner of Financial Institutions
with reference to examinations and reports pursuant to the
provisions of chapters 657 to 671, inclusive, of NRS.
Sec. 97. All books, papers and records of a merchant
acquirer limited purpose bank which has been fully liquidated
must be deposited by the receiver in the Office of the
Commissioner of Financial Institutions.
Sec. 98. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2
and 3, after the expiration of 10 years from the filing by the
Commissioner of Financial Institutions of a final report of
liquidation of any insolvent merchant acquirer limited purpose
bank, the Commissioner, with the consent of the State Board of
Finance, may destroy the records of any insolvent merchant bank
held in the Office of the Commissioner in connection with the
liquidation of the merchant bank.
2. If there are any unpaid dividends of the insolvent
merchant bank, the Commissioner of Financial Institutions shall
preserve the deposit ledger or other evidence of indebtedness of the
-
*SB438*

– 34 –
merchant bank which refers to the unpaid dividends until the
dividends have been paid.
3. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions may not
destroy any of the formal records of liquidation or any of the
records made in the Commissioner’s office with reference to the
liquidation of any insolvent merchant bank.
Sec. 99. Sections 91 to 98, inclusive, of this act, are in
addition to and not in substitution for any other remedy provided
by law.
Sec. 100. When the Commissioner of Financial Institutions
or the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation has taken
possession of any merchant acquirer limited purpose bank, the
merchant bank may, with the consent of the Commissioner,
resume business upon such terms and conditions as may be
approved by the Commissioner and the Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation.
Sec. 101. 1. When any merchant acquirer limited purpose
bank is authorized to dissolve and has taken the necessary steps to
effect dissolution in accordance with the laws of this State or the
laws of the United States, but before actual dissolution, a majority
of the directors or managers of the merchant bank, upon authority
in writing of the owners of two-thirds of its stock or two-thirds of
the members’ interests and with the approval of the Commissioner
of Financial Institutions, may execute articles of incorporation or
organization as provided in this chapter for the organization of a
new merchant bank. The articles must further set forth the
authority derived from the stockholders or members of the
merchant bank.
2. Upon the filing of articles of incorporation or organization
in the same manner as provided for the organization of new
merchant banks, the reorganized merchant bank is a merchant
bank under the laws of this State. Upon reorganization, all assets,
real and personal, of the dissolved merchant bank, by operation of
law, vest in and become the property of the reorganized merchant
bank, subject to all liabilities of the merchant bank existing before
the reorganization.
Sec. 102. Any person who knowingly makes, utters,
circulates or transmits to another, or others, any statement untrue
in fact, derogatory to the financial condition of any such merchant
acquirer limited purpose bank doing business in this State, with
intent to injure the merchant bank, or who counsels, aids,
procures or induces another to originate, make, utter, transmit or
circulate any such statement or rumor, with like intent, is guilty of
a misdemeanor.
-
*SB438*

– 35 –
Sec. 103. In addition to any other remedy or penalty, a
merchant acquirer limited purpose bank which violates any
provision of this chapter or fraudulently misrepresents the terms
of any contract or of any securities, and thereby secures a sale
therefor, shall be punished by an administrative fine of not more
than $10,000 and forfeiture and revocation of all licenses issued to
it under the provisions of this chapter.
Sec. 104. NRS 657.037 is hereby amended to read as follows:
657.037 “Depository institution” means any bank, savings and
loan association, savings bank, thrift company, credit union ,
merchant acquirer limited purpose bank or other institution,
whether chartered by this State, another state or the Federal
Government, which:
1. Holds or receives deposits, savings or share accounts;
2. Issues certificates of deposit; or
3. Provides to its customers other depository accounts which
are subject to withdrawal by checks, drafts or other instruments or
by electronic means to effect payment to a third party.
Sec. 105. NRS 658.098 is hereby amended to read as follows:
658.098 1. On a quarterly or other regular basis, the
Commissioner shall collect an assessment pursuant to this section
from each:
(a) Check-cashing service or deferred deposit loan service that is
supervised pursuant to chapter 604A of NRS;
(b) Collection agency that is supervised pursuant to chapter 649
of NRS;
(c) Bank that is supervised pursuant to chapters 657 to 668,
inclusive, of NRS;
(d) Trust company or family trust company that is supervised
pursuant to chapter 669 or 669A of NRS;
(e) Person engaged in the business of money transmission that is
supervised pursuant to chapter 671 of NRS;
(f) Savings and loan association or savings bank that is
supervised pursuant to chapter 673 of NRS;
(g) Person engaged in the business of lending that is supervised
pursuant to chapter 675 of NRS;
(h) Thrift company that is supervised pursuant to chapter 677 of
NRS;
(i) Credit union that is supervised pursuant to chapter 672 of
NRS;
(j) Consumer litigation funding company that is supervised
pursuant to chapter 604C of NRS; [and]
(k) Student loan servicer that is supervised pursuant to chapter
670B of NRS [.] ; and
-
*SB438*

– 36 –
(l) Merchant acquirer limited purpose bank that is supervised
pursuant to the chapter consisting of sections 2 to 103, inclusive,
of this act.
2. The Commissioner shall determine the total amount of all
assessments to be collected from the entities identified in subsection
1, but that amount must not exceed the amount necessary to recover
the cost of legal services provided by the Attorney General to the
Commissioner and to the Division of Financial Institutions. The
total amount of all assessments collected must be reduced by any
amounts collected by the Commissioner from an entity for the
recovery of the costs of legal services provided by the Attorney
General in a specific case.
3. The Commissioner shall collect from each entity identified
in subsection 1 an assessment that is based on:
(a) A portion of the total amount of all assessments as
determined pursuant to subsection 2, such that the assessment
collected from an entity identified in subsection 1 shall bear the
same relation to the total amount of all assessments as the total
assets of that entity bear to the total of all assets of all entities
identified in subsection 1; or
(b) Any other reasonable basis adopted by the Commissioner.
4. The assessment required by this section is in addition to any
other assessment, fee or cost required by law to be paid by an entity
identified in subsection 1.
5. Money collected by the Commissioner pursuant to this
section must be deposited in the State Treasury pursuant to the
provisions of NRS 658.091.
Sec. 106. NRS 659.125 is hereby amended to read as follows:
659.125 1. A business entity may not be organized under the
laws of this State with the words “bank” or “banking” as part of its
name except corporations or limited-liability companies subject to
regulation pursuant to chapters 657 to 668, inclusive, 673 or 677 of
NRS, or the chapter consisting of sections 2 to 103, inclusive, of
this act or corporations under the regulation of the Commissioner of
Insurance. A corporate or company name must not be amended to
include the words “bank” or “banking” unless the corporation or
company is under such regulation.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a natural
person, association, firm or corporation domiciled within this State,
except a national bank or a banking corporation subject to regulation
pursuant to chapters 657 to 668, inclusive, 673 or 677 of NRS, or
the chapter consisting of sections 2 to 103, inclusive, of this act or
under the regulation of the Commissioner of Insurance, may not
advertise or put forth any sign as bank, banking or banker or use the
word “bank,” “banking” or “banker” as part of its name and title.
-
*SB438*

– 37 –
3. A thrift company subject to the provisions of chapter 677 of
NRS may use the words “savings bank” as part of its name if its
deposits are federally insured.
4. Any person who violates any of the provisions of this
section shall be fined not more than $500 for each offense.
Sec. 107. NRS 52.450 is hereby amended to read as follows:
52.450 As used in NRS 52.450 to 52.480, inclusive, unless the
context otherwise requires:
1. “Banking or financial institution” means any bank, savings
and loan association, savings bank, thrift company , [or] credit union
or merchant acquirer limited purpose bank licensed to do business
as such in this State or any other state.
2. “Custodian of the records of a banking or financial
institution” means an employee or agent of a banking or financial
institution who has the care, custody and control of the records of
the banking or financial institution.
3. “Records of a banking or financial institution” means
memoranda, reports, records or compilations of data in any form
which are kept in the course of an activity which is regularly
conducted by a banking or financial institution.
Sec. 108. NRS 78.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
78.020 1. Trust companies, insurance companies, mutual fire
insurance companies, surety companies, express companies and
railroad companies may be formed under this chapter, but such a
corporation may not:
(a) Transact any such business within this State until it has first
complied with all laws concerning or affecting the right to engage in
such business.
(b) Infringe the laws of any other state or country in which it
may intend to engage in business, by so incorporating under this
chapter.
2. No savings and loan association, savings bank, thrift
company , merchant acquirer limited purpose bank or corporation
organized for the purpose of conducting a banking business may be
organized under this chapter.
Sec. 109. NRS 78.045 is hereby amended to read as follows:
78.045 1. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing
any articles of incorporation or any certificate of amendment of
articles of incorporation of any corporation formed pursuant to the
laws of this State which provides that the name of the corporation
contains the word “bank” or “trust,” unless:
(a) It appears from the articles or the certificate of amendment
that the corporation proposes to carry on business as a banking or
trust company, exclusively or in connection with its business as a
-
*SB438*

– 38 –
bank, savings and loan association, savings bank , [or] thrift
company [;] or merchant acquirer limited purpose bank; and
(b) The articles or certificate of amendment is first approved by
the Commissioner of Financial Institutions.
2. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing any articles
of incorporation or any certificate of amendment of articles of
incorporation of any corporation formed pursuant to the provisions
of this chapter if it appears from the articles or the certificate of
amendment that the business to be carried on by the corporation is
subject to supervision by the Commissioner of Insurance or by the
Commissioner of Financial Institutions, unless the articles or
certificate of amendment is approved by the Commissioner who will
supervise the business of the corporation.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, the Secretary
of State shall not accept for filing any articles of incorporation or
any certificate of amendment of articles of incorporation of any
corporation formed pursuant to the laws of this State if the name of
the corporation contains the words “engineer,” “engineered,”
“engineering,” “professional engineer,” “registered engineer” or
“licensed engineer” unless:
(a) The State Board of Professional Engineers and Land
Surveyors certifies that the principals of the corporation are licensed
to practice engineering pursuant to the laws of this State; or
(b) The State Board of Professional Engineers and Land
Surveyors certifies that the corporation is exempt from the
prohibitions of NRS 625.520.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, the Secretary
of State shall not accept for filing any articles of incorporation or
any certificate of amendment of articles of incorporation of any
corporation formed pursuant to the laws of this State if the name of
the corporation contains the words “architect,” “architecture,”
“registered architect,” “licensed architect,” “registered interior
designer,” “registered interior design,” “residential designer,”
“registered residential designer,” “licensed residential designer” or
“residential design” unless the State Board of Architecture, Interior
Design and Residential Design certifies that:
(a) The principals of the corporation are holders of a certificate
of registration to practice architecture or residential design or to
practice as a registered interior designer, as applicable, pursuant to
the laws of this State; or
(b) The corporation is qualified to do business in this State
pursuant to NRS 623.349.
5. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing any articles
of incorporation or any certificate of amendment of articles of
incorporation of any corporation formed pursuant to the laws of this
-
*SB438*

– 39 –
State which provides that the name of the corporation contains the
word “accountant,” “accounting,” “accountancy,” “auditor” or
“auditing” unless the Nevada State Board of Accountancy certifies
that the corporation:
(a) Is registered pursuant to the provisions of chapter 628 of
NRS; or
(b) Has filed with the Nevada State Board of Accountancy under
penalty of perjury a written statement that the corporation is not
engaged in the practice of accounting and is not offering to practice
accounting in this State.
6. The Secretary of State shall not accept for filing any articles
of incorporation or any certificate of amendment of articles of
incorporation of any corporation formed or existing pursuant to the
laws of this State which provides that the name of the corporation
contains the words “common-interest community,” “community
association,” “master association,” “unit-owners’ association” or
“homeowners’ association” or if it appears in the articles of
incorporation or certificate of amendment that the purpose of the
corporation is to operate as a unit-owners’ association pursuant to
chapter 116 or 116B of NRS unless the Administrator of the Real
Estate Division of the Department of Business and Industry certifies
that the corporation has:
(a) Registered with the Ombudsman for Owners in Common-
Interest Communities and Condominium Hotels pursuant to NRS
116.31158 or 116B.625; and
(b) Paid to the Administrator of the Real Estate Division the fees
required pursuant to NRS 116.31155 or 116B.620.
7. The provisions of subsections 3 and 4 do not apply to any
corporation, whose securities are publicly traded and regulated by
the Securities Exchange Act, which does not engage in the practice
of professional engineering, architecture or residential design or
interior design, as applicable.
8. The Commissioner of Financial Institutions and the
Commissioner of Insurance may approve or disapprove the articles
or amendments referred to them pursuant to the provisions of this
section.
Sec. 110. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
-
*SB438*

– 40 –
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
-
*SB438*

– 41 –
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, and section 77 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41 of
chapter 478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter 391,
Statutes of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law to be
confidential, all public books and public records of a governmental
entity must be open at all times during office hours to inspection by
any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or memorandum
may be prepared from those public books and public records. Any
such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to supply the
-
*SB438*

– 42 –
general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the records or
may be used in any other way to the advantage of the governmental
entity or of the general public. This section does not supersede or in
any manner affect the federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge,
diminish or affect in any other manner the rights of a person in any
written book or record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 111. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage
and approval.
2. Sections 1 to 110, inclusive, of this act become effective:
-
*SB438*

– 43 –
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB438*